California statutes. Penal Code
(2) The extent to which the department is achieving the objective of operating a fully functioning and centralized pharmacy distribution center, as set forth in this section, that distributes pharmaceuticals to every adult prison under the jurisdiction of the department, as well as the most significant reasons for achieving or not achieving that objective.

(3) The extent to which the centralized pharmacy distribution center is achieving cost savings through improved efficiency and distribution of unit dose medications.

(4) A description of planned or implemented initiatives to accomplish the next 12 months’ objectives for achieving the goals set
 forth in this section, including a fully functioning and centralized pharmacy distribution center that distributes pharmaceuticals to every adult facility under the jurisdiction of the department.

(5) The costs for prescription pharmaceuticals for the previous fiscal year, both statewide and at each adult prison under the jurisdiction of the department, and a comparison of these costs with those of the prior fiscal year.

(f) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (e) is inoperative on March 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 74.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.5.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall adopt policies, procedures, and criteria to identify selected medication categories for the development of utilization protocols based on best practices, and the use of generic and therapeutic substitutes, as appropriate.

(b) The department shall develop utilization and treatment protocols for select medication categories based on defined priority criteria, including, but not limited to, the cost of the medications.

(c) On or before April 1, 2006, the department shall provide information, as part of the fiscal committee budget hearings for the 2006–07 budget year, on the impact of the adoption of these protocols.

(d) The department shall coordinate the implementation of this section with the Department of General Services’ prescription drug bulk purchasing program pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 14977) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, in order to better achieve the goals and intent of that program.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall complete the implementation of this section utilizing the existing resources of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 383, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.

(a) On or before July 1, 1993, the Department of Corrections shall implement and maintain procedures to identify inmates serving terms in state prison who are undocumented aliens subject to deportation. This identification procedure shall be completed, as to each inmate, within 90 days of the Department of Corrections having taken custody of the inmate.

(b) The procedures implemented
 by the department, pursuant to subdivision (a), shall include, but not be limited to, the following criteria for determining the country of citizenship of any person serving a term in state prison:

(1) Country of citizenship.

(2) Place of birth.

(3) Inmate’s statements.

(4) Prior parole records.

(5) Prior arrest records.

(6) Probation Officer’s Report (POR).

(7) Information from the Department of Justice’s Criminal Identification and Information Unit.

(8) Other legal documents.

(c) The Department of Corrections shall report annually to the Legislature the number of persons identified as undocumented aliens pursuant to subdivision (a). The reports shall contain the number of persons referred, the race, national origin, and national ancestry of persons referred, the offense or offenses for which the person was committed to state prison, and the disposition of the referral, if known.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 565, Sec. 5.   Effective September 16, 1994.   Superseded on operative date of amendment by Stats. 1994, Ch. 567, as further amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.

(a) Immediately upon the effective date of the amendments to this section made at the 1993–94 First Extraordinary Session of the Legislature, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Youth and Community Restoration shall implement and maintain procedures to identify, within 90 days of assuming custody, inmates serving terms in state prison or wards of the Department of Youth and Community Restoration who are undocumented felons subject to deportation. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Youth and Community Restoration shall refer to the United States Department of Homeland Security the name and location of any inmate or ward who may be an undocumented
 immigrant and who may be subject to deportation for a determination of whether the inmate or ward is undocumented and subject to deportation. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Youth and Community Restoration shall make case files available to the United States
 Department of Homeland Security for purposes of investigation.

(b) The procedures implemented by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, the following criteria for determining the country of citizenship of any person serving a term in the state prison:

(1) Country of citizenship.

(2) Place of birth.

(3) Inmate’s statements.

(4) Prior parole records.

(5) Prior arrest records.

(6) Probation Officer’s Report (POR).

(7) Information from the Department of Justice’s Criminal
 Identification and Information Unit.

(8) Other legal documents.

(c) Within 48 hours of identifying an inmate or ward as an undocumented felon pursuant to subdivision (a), the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Youth and Community Restoration shall cause the inmate or ward to be transferred to the custody of the United States Attorney General for appropriate action. Once an inmate or ward has been identified as an undocumented felon by the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service, the inmate or ward shall not undergo any additional evaluation or classification procedures other than those required for the safety or security of the institution, the inmate or ward, or the public.

(d) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Youth and Community Restoration shall report quarterly to the Legislature the number of persons referred to the United States Department of Homeland Security pursuant to subdivision (a). The report shall contain the number of persons transported, the race, national origin, and national ancestry of persons transported, the offense or offenses for which the persons were committed to state prison, and the facilities to which the persons were transported.

(e) For purposes of this section, “immigrant” means a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 133) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 49.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5026.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Youth and Community Restoration shall cooperate with the United States Department of Homeland Security by providing the use of prison facilities, transportation, and general support, as needed, for the purposes of conducting and expediting deportation hearings and subsequent placement of deportation holds on undocumented immigrants who are incarcerated in state prison.

(b) For purposes of this section, “immigrant” means a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 50.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed conditionally by Stats. 1994, Ch. 567, Secs. 3 and 6, upon enactment of specified federal legislation.)
-------------------------------------------

5027.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall award funding for an innovative grant program to not-for-profit organizations to replicate their programs at institutions that the Director of the Division of Rehabilitative Programs has determined are underserved by volunteer and not-for-profit organizations. The director shall develop a formula for identifying target institutions based upon factors including, but not limited to, number of volunteers, number of inmates, number of volunteer-based programs, and the size of waiting lists for inmates wanting to participate in programs.

(b) Grant funding shall be provided to not-for-profit organizations wishing to expand programs that they are
 currently providing in other California state prisons that have demonstrated success and focus on offender responsibility and restorative justice principles or to not-for-profit organizations with experience in providing programming in a correctional setting. The grants shall be awarded for a three-year period and are designed to be one time in nature. All funding shall go directly to the not-for-profit organizations and shall not be used for custody staff or administration of the grant. Any unspent funds shall revert to the fund source authorized for this
 purpose at the end of three years.

(c) On or before January 1 of each year, the department shall report to the budget committees and public safety committees in both houses of the Legislature on the following information from the previous fiscal year’s grants:

(1) The number of grants provided.

(2) The institutions receiving grants.

(3) A description of each program and level of funding provided, organized by institution.

(4) The start date of each program.

(5) Any feedback from inmates participating in the programs on the value of the programs.

(6) Any feedback
 from the program providers on their experience with each institution.

(7) The number of participants participating in each program.

(8) The number of participants completing each program.

(9) Waiting lists, if any, for each program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 26.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5028.

(a) Upon the entry of any person who is currently or was previously a foreign national into a facility operated by the Department of Corrections, the Director of Corrections shall inform the person that he or she may apply to be transferred to serve the remainder of his or her prison term in his or her current or former nation of citizenship. The director shall inform the person that he or she may contact his or her consulate and shall ensure that if notification is requested by the inmate, that the inmate’s nearest consulate or embassy is
 notified without delay of his or her incarceration.

(b) Upon the request of a foreign consulate representing a nation that requires mandatory notification under Article 36 of the Vienna Convention on Consular Relations Treaty listed in subdivision (d) of Section 834c, the Department of Corrections shall provide the foreign consulate with a list of the names and locations of all inmates in its custody that have self-identified that nation as his or her place of birth.

(c) The Department of Corrections shall implement and maintain procedures to process applications for the transfer of prisoners to their current or former nations of citizenship under subdivision (a) and shall forward all applications to the Governor or his or her designee for appropriate action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5029.

(a) The Director of Corrections shall ensure that documents, computers, or computer accessible media containing personal information relating to an employee of the Department of Corrections are not removed from the state prison without proper authorization from the warden or his or her designee.

(b) Any employee of the Department of Corrections who, without proper authorization, knowingly removes personal information relating to an employee of the Department of Corrections from
 the state prison in violation of subdivision (a), or who fails to provide the appropriate notice as required in subdivision (c), is subject to disciplinary action.

(c) (1) An employee who removes personal information shall, once the employee is aware that the information either is lost or stolen or cannot be accounted for, make a reasonable effort to immediately notify the warden, or his or her designee, of that fact. 

(2) The warden, or his or her designee, shall attempt to notify the employee whose personal information either is lost or stolen or cannot be accounted for within 24 hours of receiving the notice under paragraph (1).

(d) For purposes of this section, “personal information” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code.

(e) It is not the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to inhibit or prevent a person from making a disclosure of improper governmental activity that is protected by subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6129, or by the California Whistleblower Protection Act, Article 3 (commencing with Section 8547) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or by the Whistleblower Protection Act, Article 10 (commencing with Section 9149.20) of Chapter 1.5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Furthermore, nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the authority of the Office of the Inspector General pursuant to Section 6126.5 of this code, nor the authority of the State Auditor pursuant to Section 8545.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 240, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5030.1.

(a) The possession or use of tobacco products by inmates under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections is prohibited. The Director of Corrections shall adopt regulations to implement this prohibition, which shall include an exemption for departmentally approved religious ceremonies.

(b) The use of tobacco products by any person not included in subdivision (a) on the grounds of any institution or facility under the jurisdiction of the
 Department of Corrections is prohibited, with the exception of residential staff housing where inmates are not present.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 798, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 798.)
-------------------------------------------

5031.

(a) The department shall submit an estimate of expenditures for each state or contracted facility housing offenders and for the cost of supervising offenders on parole, by region, for inclusion in the annual Governor’s Budget and the May Revision thereto. The department shall submit its preliminary estimates for the current and next fiscal years to the Department of Finance by October 1 of each year and revised estimates by April 1 of the following year. The
 Department of Finance shall approve, modify, or deny the assumptions underlying all estimates and the population estimates released for the annual Governor’s Budget and the May Revision. The April 1 submission shall only be a revision of the October 1 estimates and may not include any new assumptions or estimates from those submitted in the October 1 estimate.

(b) The population estimate for each state or contracted adult or juvenile facility shall contain, at least, the following:

(1) The capacity, as measured by the number of beds, categorized by cells, dorms, and intended security level.

(2) The projected number of offenders, by security level.

(3) The actual number of offenders, by security level.

(4) The number of offenders in a security level that differ from the classification score.

(5) The number of offenders, by program, that could benefit from rehabilitative programming, as identified by an assessment of risk and criminogenic needs.

(6) The actual number of offenders, by program, that receive rehabilitative programming based on an assessment of risk and criminogenic needs.

(7) A comparison of the number of authorized positions, filled positions, and vacant positions, by classification.

(8) The budget authority, as displayed in the annual Budget Act by program, compared to fiscal year-to-date expenditures and projected expenditures for the fiscal year.

(c) The
 population estimate for the Division of Adult Parole Operations shall contain at least the following:

(1) The projected number of offenders in each subpopulation, by region, and the total number of offenders.

(2) The actual number of offenders in each subpopulation, by region, and the total number of offenders.

(3) The number of offenders, by region, that could benefit from rehabilitative programming, as identified by an assessment of risk and criminogenic needs.

(4) The actual number of offenders, by region, that receive rehabilitative programming based on an assessment of risk and criminogenic needs.

(5) The number of ratio-driven positions budgeted in each region.

(6) The number of nonratio positions budgeted in each region, by function.

(7) A comparison of the number of authorized positions, filled positions, and vacant positions, by region and function.

(8) The budget authority, as displayed in the annual Budget Act by program, compared to fiscal year-to-date expenditures and projected expenditures for the fiscal year.

(d) The estimates shall include fiscal charts that track appropriations from the Budget Act to the current Governor’s Budget and the May Revision for all fund sources for the current year and budget year.

(e) In the event that the methodological steps employed to arrive at previous estimates differ from those proposed, the department
 shall submit a descriptive narrative of the revised methodology. This information shall be provided to the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the public safety policy committees and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(f) On or after January 10, if the Department of Finance discovers a material error in the information provided pursuant to this section, the Department of Finance shall inform the consultants to the fiscal committees of the Legislature of the error in a timely manner.

(g) The departmental estimates, assumptions, and other supporting data prepared for purposes of this section shall be forwarded annually to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the public safety policy committees and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 75.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5032.

Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to the closure of a prison or juvenile facility operated or leased by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or to any activity or approval necessary for, or incidental to, the closure of a prison or juvenile facility operated or leased by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, including, but not limited to, a prison or juvenile facility that was identified or designated for closure before the effective date of this section. This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 27.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5033.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to close additional prisons in the state prison system.

(2) Maintaining prison capacity beyond what is necessary for safety, operational flexibility, and to support rehabilitation is not cost effective and reducing excess capacity of the prison system would create savings that may be used for rehabilitative and other purposes.

(b) To help inform decisions relating to prison closures, the department shall prepare and submit to the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature, a preliminary assessment on or
 before August 15, 2023, and a completed assessment on or before November 15, 2023, of systemwide capacity, including an estimate of the department’s overall housing needs based on its population projections. The department shall include information relating to the necessary operational capacity for each state-owned and -operated prison that allows each facility to operate in a manner that is rehabilitative, safe, and cost efficient. The department shall include an assessment of available space for educational and rehabilitative programming, health care services, specialized bed needs, flexible bed needs, including those needed for quarantines or natural disasters, and space needed to comply with class action litigation requirements. The preliminary assessment shall include the department’s methodology and preliminary data and findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 21.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5034.

(a) The department shall establish and maintain an Accountability Letter Bank (ALB) program.

(b) The goals of the program shall be both of the following:

(1) To allow victims, survivors, and next of kin to receive a letter of accountability from an incarcerated person when, and if, they choose to receive a letter that is addressed to them.

(2) To provide an opportunity for incarcerated persons under the jurisdiction of the department to express accountability and remorse for the harm they have caused.

(c) All letters submitted to the ALB shall be reviewed by an ALB program facilitator to ensure they are not harmful to the victim, survivor, or next of kin.

(d) If a victim, survivor, or next of kin wishes to receive the offender’s letter, the ALB program facilitator shall make the letter available through any of the following:

(1) By mail.

(2) By email.

(3) Upon request by the victim, survivor, or next of kin, an ALB program facilitator may read the letter with the victim, survivor, or next of kin in person or by telephone.

(e) If an incarcerated person decides to participate in a
 program to draft and submit a letter to the ALB, the program shall be administered by a community-based nonprofit organization.

(f) Participation in the ALB program shall be voluntary.

(g) Incarcerated people shall be able to update letters they submit to the ALB. Letters submitted to the ALB shall only be retained for purposes of providing them to the person to whom it is addressed.

(h) Letters submitted to the ALB shall not be included in an incarcerated person’s central file.

(i) A letter submitted to the ALB, and a person’s participation in or lack of participation in the ALB program, shall not be considered in a parole suitability decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 980, Sec. 1.   (SB 379)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.

(a) The department shall establish and maintain a Victim Offender Dialogue (VOD) program.

(b) The goal of the program is to provide opportunities for restorative justice processes between victims, survivors, and next of kin of victims of crime and people who are incarcerated or on parole, which often culminate in a dialogue between those parties.

(c) The
 VOD program shall be administered and coordinated by the department’s Office of Victim and Survivor Rights and Services and shall utilize nonprofit, community-based
 restorative justice organizations to facilitate the VOD processes.

(d) Participation in the VOD program shall be voluntary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 980, Sec. 2.   (SB 379)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation [5050. - 5073.]

5050.

Commencing July 1, 2005, any reference to the Director of Corrections in this or any other code refers to the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. As of that date, the office of the Director of Corrections is abolished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 36.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5051.2.

The Director of Corrections shall have wide and successful administrative experience in adult or youth correctional programs embodying rehabilitative concepts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

5052.

Any officer or employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation designated in writing by the secretary, shall have the power of a head of a department pursuant to Article 2 (commencing at Section 11180) of Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 39.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5054.

Commencing July 1, 2005, the supervision, management and control of the state prisons, and the responsibility for the care, custody, treatment, training, discipline and employment of persons confined therein are vested in the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 41.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5054.1.

The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has full power to order returned to custody any person under the secretary’s jurisdiction. The written order of the secretary shall be sufficient warrant for any peace officer to return to actual custody any escaped state prisoner or any state prisoner released prior to his or her scheduled release date who should be returned to custody. All peace officers shall execute an order as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 49.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5054.2.

Whenever a person is incarcerated in a state prison for violating Section 261, 264.1, 266c, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or former Section 288a, and the victim of one or more of those offenses is a child under the age of 18 years, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall protect the interest of that child victim by prohibiting visitation between the incarcerated person and the child victim pursuant to Section 1202.05. The secretary shall allow visitation only when the juvenile court, pursuant to Section 362.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, finds that visitation between the incarcerated person and his or her child victim is in the best interests of the child
 victim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 110.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5055.

Commencing July 1, 2005, all powers and duties previously granted to and imposed upon the Department of Corrections shall be exercised by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, except where those powers and duties are expressly vested by law in the Board of Parole Hearings.

Whenever a power is granted to the secretary or a duty is imposed upon the secretary, the power may be exercised or the duty performed
 by a subordinate officer to the secretary or by a person authorized pursuant to law by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 42.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5055.5.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop a Data Dashboard as described in subdivisions (b) and (c) for each institution on a quarterly basis and post those reports on the department’s Internet Web site. The department shall post both current fiscal-year reports and reports for the immediately preceding three fiscal years for each institution. The department shall also post corrections made to inaccurate or incomplete data
 to current or previous reports.

(b) Each report shall include a brief biography of the warden, including whether he or she is an acting or permanent warden, and a brief description of the prison, including the total number and level of inmates.

(c) Each report shall be created using the following information already collected using the COMPSTAT (computer assisted statistics) reports for each prison and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following indicators:

(1) Staff vacancies, overtime, sick leave, and number of authorized staff positions.

(2) Rehabilitation programs, including enrollment capacity, actual enrollment, and diploma and GED completion rate.

(3) Number of
 deaths, specifying homicides, suicides, unexpected deaths, and expected deaths.

(4) Number of use of force incidents.

(5) Number of inmate appeals, including the number being processed, overdue, dismissed, and upheld.

(6) Number of inmates in administrative segregation.

(7) Total contraband seized, specifying the number of cellular telephones and drugs.

(d) Each report shall also include the following information, which is not currently collected or displayed by COMPSTAT:

(1) Total budget, including actual expenditures.

(2) Number of days in
 lockdown.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 162, Sec. 2.   (SB 601)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5056.

(a) Each state prison under the jurisdiction of the department shall have a citizens’ advisory committee except that one committee may serve every prison located in the same city or community. Each committee shall consist of not more than 15 members appointed by the institution’s warden, nine of whom shall be appointed from a list of nominations submitted to him or her as follows:

(1) Two persons from nominations submitted by the Assembly Member in whose district the prison is
 located.

(2) Two persons from nominations submitted by the Senator in whose district the prison is located.

(3) Two persons from nominations submitted by the city council of the city containing or nearest to the institution.

(4) Two persons from nominations submitted by the county board of supervisors of the county containing the institution.

(5) One person from nominations submitted by the chief of police of the city containing or nearest to the institution and the county sheriff of the county containing the institution.

(b) Where a citizens’ advisory committee serves more than one prison, the warden of each prison served by this committee shall collaborate with every other warden of a
 prison served by the committee for the purpose of appointing committee members.

(c) Each committee shall select its own chairperson by a majority vote of its members. The term of office of all members shall be two years. In the event of a vacancy due to resignation, death, or absence from three consecutive meetings, the appointing power shall fill the vacancy following receipt of written notification that a vacancy has occurred.

(d) Each committee shall meet at least once every two months or as often, on the call of the chairperson, as necessary to carry out the purposes and duties of the committee. Meetings of the committee shall be open to the public. The warden of each institution shall meet with the committee at least four times each year.

The advisory committees of the several institutions shall have the power of visitation of prison
 facilities and personnel in furtherance of the goals of this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the disclosure by the department of information which may threaten the security of an institution or the safety of the surrounding community, nor shall the power of visitation specified in subdivision (d) extend to situations where institutional security would be jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 942, Sec. 2.   Effective October 12, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5056.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that due to the local conditions resulting in the Chino Valley Independent Fire District having within its area of service two state institutions under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the California Institution for Men and the California Institution for Women, special legislation is needed to address the need for the citizens’ advisory committees responsible for those institutions to have
 an additional member representing the Chino Valley Independent Fire District.

(b) In addition to the members designated for the citizens’ advisory committees that advise the California Institution for Men and the California Institution for Women pursuant to Section 5056, there shall be an additional member representing the Chino Valley Independent Fire District, nominated by the Chino Valley Independent Fire District, for selection by the warden, pursuant to Section 5056.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   (AB 430)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5057.

(a) Subject to the powers of the Department of Finance under Section 13300 of the Government Code, the secretary shall establish an accounting and auditing system for all of the agencies and institutions including the prisons which comprise the department in whatever form that will best facilitate their operation, and may modify the system from time to time.

(b) The accounting and auditing
 system shall include those accounts and records that are necessary to properly account for all money and property of the inmates.

(c) Except where other disposition is provided by law, all money belonging to the state received by the department, shall be reported to the Controller and deposited in the State Treasury monthly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 43.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5057.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the Director of Corrections may accept a gift or donation of goods or services to the state following a review and determination by the director that the gift or donation is not subject to illegal or discriminatory conditions, that it does not involve the expenditure of state funds, and that the acceptance of the gift is in the best interests of the state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the acceptance of a gift or donation that would involve any expenditure of state funds shall be subject to Section 11005 of
 the Government Code.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to recognize the significant contribution that private donors of goods and services can make in supporting the corrections system, and the development of effective vocational education and correctional industries in our prison system. With that objective in mind, the Director of Corrections is encouraged to further develop the current system of gifts and donations through the design of a prompt and efficient review procedure that will encourage donors and protect the interests of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.

(a) (1) The director may prescribe and amend rules and regulations for the administration of the prisons and for the administration of the parole of persons sentenced under Section 1170 except those persons who meet the criteria set forth in Section 2962. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated and filed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in this section and Sections 5058.1 to 5058.3, inclusive. All rules and regulations shall, to the extent practical, be stated in language that is easily understood by the general public.

(2) For any rule or regulation filed as regular rulemaking as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations, copies of the rule or regulation shall be posted in conspicuous places throughout each institution and shall be mailed to all persons or organizations who request them no less than 20 days prior to its effective date.

(b) The director shall maintain, publish, and make available to the general public, a compendium of the rules and regulations promulgated by the director pursuant to this section and Sections 5058.1 to 5058.3, inclusive.

(c) The following are deemed not to be “regulations” as defined in Section 11342.600 of the Government Code:

(1) Rules issued by the director applying solely to a particular prison or other correctional facility, provided that the following conditions are met:

(A) All rules that apply to prisons or other correctional facilities throughout the state are adopted by the director pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(B) All rules except those that are excluded from disclosure to the public pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code are made available to all inmates confined in the particular prison or other correctional facility to which the rules apply and to all members of the general public.

(2) Short-term criteria for the placement of inmates in a new prison or other correctional facility, or subunit thereof, during its first six months of operation, or in a prison or other correctional facility, or subunit thereof, planned for closing during its last six months of operation, provided that the criteria are made available to the public and that an estimate of fiscal impact is completed pursuant to Sections 6650 to 6670, inclusive, of the State Administrative Manual.

(3) Rules issued by the director that are excluded from disclosure to the public pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 343.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.1.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “pilot program” means a program implemented on a temporary and limited basis in order to test and evaluate the effectiveness of the program, develop new techniques, or gather information.

(b) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation by the director to implement a legislatively mandated or authorized pilot program or a departmentally authorized pilot program, is exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, if the following conditions are met:

(1) A pilot program affecting male inmates affects no more than 10 percent of the total state male inmate population; a pilot program affecting female inmates affects no more than 10 percent of the total state female inmate population; and a pilot program affecting male and female inmates affects no more than 10 percent of the total state inmate population.
